Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.485

Ride share license plates.

"Ride share license plates" means special license plates issued for motor vehicles that are used primarily for commuter ride sharing as defined in *RCW 46.74.010.

[ 2010 c 161 s 137.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 46.74.010 was amended by 2021 c 135 s 2, deleting the definition of "commuter ride sharing."

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.